Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201660-372
Vehicle titling and registration computer
system; agent of county treasurer; appointment.

(1) Each
county shall issue and file registration certificates using the vehicle titling
and registration computer system prescribed by the department.

(2) The county treasurer may appoint an agent to issue registration
certificates and to accept the payment of taxes and fees as provided in the
Motor Vehicle Registration Act, upon approval of the county board. The agent
shall furnish a bond in such amount and upon such conditions as determined
by the county board.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 72;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 54.